Utah statutes.
75-5-405.   Notice.

(1) On a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order, the person to be protected and his spouse or, if none, his parents, must be served personally with notice of the proceeding at least 10 days before the date of the hearing if they can be found within the state, or, if they cannot be found within the state, they must be given notice in accordance with Section 75-1-401. Waiver by the person to be protected is not effective unless he attends the hearing or, unless minority is the reason for the proceeding, waiver is confirmed in an interview with the visitor.

(2)  Notice of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other initial protective order, and of any subsequent hearing, must be given to any person who has filed a request for notice under Section 75-5-406 and to interested persons and other persons as the court may direct. Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (1) above, notice shall be given in accordance with Section 75-1-401.

